pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Acessórios para calçado > Acessórios para inserir em calçado: Degraus antiderrapantes; Suportes de arco plantar; Palmilhas de gel; Almofadas de calcanhar; Protetores de dedos dos pés
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Аксесоари за обувки > Стелки за обувки: Противоплъзгащи стелки; Ортопедични стелки; Гел подложки; Възглавнички за пета; Подложки за пръсти
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Kenkätarvikkeet > Muotoilevat pohjalliset: Liukuestopohjat; Kaarituet; Geelipohjalliset; Kantapehmusteet; Päkiäpehmusteet
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Doplnky obuvi > Vložky do topánok: Protišmykové pásy; Ortopedické vložky; Gélové podložky; Chrániče päty; Chrániče prstov na nohách
en: Apparel & Accessories > Shoe Accessories > Shoe Inserts: Anti Slip Steps; Arch Supports; Gel Pads; Heel Cushions; Toe Pads
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Accessoires pour chaussures > Semelles de chaussures: Marches antidérapantes; Supports d’arcs; Coussinets de gel; Coussinets de talon; Embouts de protection pour orteils
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 靴用品 > 靴インサート: 滑り止め; アーチサポート; ジェルパッド; かかとクッション; トゥパッド
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tilbehør til sko > Skoindlæg: Skridsikre trin; Buestøtter; Gelpuder; Hælpuder; Tåpuder
es: Ropa y accesorios > Accesorios para zapatos > Alzas para zapatos: Apoyos antideslizantes; Soportes de arco; Almohadillas de gel; Almohadillas para el talón; Almohadillas para los dedos
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Dodaci za obuću > Umetci za obuću: Protuklizne stepenice; Ulošci za potporu svoda stopala; Jastučići s gelom; Jastuci za petu; Jastučići za nožne prste
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Аксессуары для обуви > Стельки и вставки: Противоскользящие вставки; Ортопедические стельки; Гелевые подушечки; Подпяточники; Вкладыши для мыска
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Batų aksesuarai > Batų įdėklai: Apsaugos nuo slydimo; Arkos atramos; Gelio pagalvėlės; Kulnų pagalvėlės; Pirštų pagalvėlės
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Accesorii pentru încălțăminte > Inserții pentru pantofi: Inserții antiderapante; Suporturi boltă; Pernițe cu gel; Pernițe pentru călcâi; Pernițe pentru degete
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Ayakkabı Aksesuarları > Ayakkabı İçleri: Kaymayı Önleyici Basamaklar; Kemer Destekleri; Jel Pedler; Topuk Yastıkları; Parmak pedleri
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Accessoires voor schoenen > Schoeninzetstukken: Antisliptreden; Steunzolen; Gelpads; Hielkussens; Teenpads
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 鞋類配件 > 加裝鞋墊: 防滑貼條; 足弓支撐鞋墊; 膠墊; 腳跟墊; 腳趾保護墊
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Acessórios para sapatos > Palmilhas ortopédicas: Degraus antiderrapantes; Suportes de arco; Almofadas de gel; Almofadas de calcanhar; Protetores para dedos dos pés
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 鞋类配饰 > 鞋垫: 防滑阶梯; 足弓支撑; 凝胶垫; 脚跟垫; 鞋头垫
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Phụ kiện giày > Miếng lót giày: Miếng dán cầu thang chống trượt; Miếng đệm lòng bàn chân; Miếng lót dạng gel; Miếng dán gót chân; Miếng lót mũi giày
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Αξεσουάρ παπουτσιών > Εσωτερικά πέλματα παπουτσιών: Αντιολισθητικές επενδύσεις παπουτσιών; Υποστηρίγματα καμάρας; Πάτοι από τζελ; Μαξιλαράκια φτέρνα; Μαξιλαράκια δαχτύλων
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Doplňky k obuvi > Vložky do bot: Protiskluzové nášlapy; Podpěry klenby; Gelové vložky; Polštářky na paty; Vložky pod špičku
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > อุปกรณ์รองเท้า > แผ่นเสริมรองเท้า: ส่วนกันลื่น; ส่วนรองรับส่วนโค้งเว้าของฝ่าเท้า; แผ่นเจล; เบาะรองส้นเท้า; แผ่นรองปลายเท้า
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Accessori per scarpe > Plantari per scarpe: Adesivi antiscivolo per gradini; Plantari ortopedici; Cuscinetti in gel; Cuscinetti per talloni; Cuscinetti per dita
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Dodatki za obutev > Vložki za čevlje: Protizdrsne podloge; Podpore za stopalni lok; Podloge iz gela; Blazine za pete; Ščitniki za nožne prste
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Skotillbehör > Skosulor: Anti-halkskydd; Hålfotsstöd; Gelkuddar; Hälkuddar; Tåkuddar
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Akcesoria do butów > Wkładki do obuwia: Wkładki antypoślizgowe; Wkładki podpierające sklepienie; Wkładki żelowe; Podpiętki; Wkładki pod palce
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 신발 액세서리 > 신발 깔창: 미끄럼 방지 패드; 아치 지지대; 젤 패드; 뒤꿈치 쿠션; 토 패드
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Schuh-Accessoires > Schuheinlagen: Rutschfeste Einlagen; Senkfußeinlage; Gelpads; Fersenkissen; Zehenpolster
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Cipőkiegészítők > Cipőbetétek: Csúszásgátló lépcsők; Boltozattámaszok; Lábboltozat-párnák; Sarokpárnák; Lábujjpárnák
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Skotilbehør > Skoinnlegg: Sklisikre såler; Innleggssåler; Gelputer; Hælputer; Tåputer